Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-352
Suspension of operator's license, defined.

Suspension of operator's license means the temporary withdrawal by formal action of the department of a person's motor vehicle operator's license for a period specifically designated by the department, if any, and until compliance with all conditions for reinstatement.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 52.